Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Chapter 11 Deposit of Funds

§ 13-11-101.
Deposit of funds.

All fees, costs, compensation and expenses of any type provided for under this title, or any rule promulgated under authority granted under this title, required to be paid to the state banking commissioner and not otherwise designated for deposit shall be deposited by the state banking commissioner with the state treasurer and credited to the financial institutions administration account.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 156, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”